dictionaries/el_GR/hyph_el_GR.dic
UTF-8
α1
ε1
η1
ι1
ο1
υ1
ω1
α2ι1
α2ί3
α2ΐ
α2υ1
α2ύ3
α2ΰ
ά3υ1
ε2ι1
ε2ί3
ε2ΐ
ε2υ1
ε2ύ3
ε2ΰ
έ3υ1
η2υ1
η2ύ3
ή3
ή3υ1
ο2ι1
ο2ί3
ο2ΐ
ο2υ1
ο2ύ3
ο2ΰ
ό3υ1
υ2ι1
υ2ί3
υ2ΐ
ύ3
ύ3ι1
α2η1
ά3η1
α2ϊ
ά3ι.
άι1
α2ϋ
ε2ϊ
ε2ϋ
ο2ε2ι1
οε1
ο2η1
ό3η.
όη1
ο2ϊ
ό3ι.
όι1
ι2α1
ι2ά
ι2ε1
ι2έ
ι2ο1
ι2ό
ο3ϊ3ό
ι2ω1
ι2ώ
.ι3
ί3
η2α1
η2ά
η2ε1
η2έ
η2ο1
η2ό
η2ω1
η2ώ
.η3
υ2α1
υ2ά
υ2ο1
υ2ό
υ2ω1
υ2ώ
.υ3
4β.
4γ.
4γ4κ.
4δ.
4ζ.
4θ.
4κ.
4λ.
4μ.
4μ4π.
4ν.
4ν4τ.
4ξ.
4π.
4ρ.
4σ.
4ς.
4τ.
4τ4ζ.
4τ4σ.
4τ4ς.
4φ.
4χ.
4ψ.
4'ά
4'έ
4'ή3
4'ί3
4'ό
4'ύ3
4'ώ
4β4'ά
4β4'έ
4β4'ή3
4β4'ί3
4β4'ό
4β4'ύ3
4β4'ώ
4γ4'ά
4γ4'έ
4γ4'ή3
4γ4'ί3
4γ4'ό
4γ4'ύ3
4γ4'ώ
4γ4κ4'ά
4γ4κ4'έ
4γ4κ4'ή3
4γ4κ4'ί3
4γ4κ4'ό
4γ4κ4'ύ3
4γ4κ4'ώ
4δ4'ά
4δ4'έ
4δ4'ή3
4δ4'ί3
4δ4'ό
4δ4'ύ3
4δ4'ώ
4ζ4'ά
4ζ4'έ
4ζ4'ή3
4ζ4'ί3
4ζ4'ό
4ζ4'ύ3
4ζ4'ώ
4θ4'ά
4θ4'έ
4θ4'ή3
4θ4'ί3
4θ4'ό
4θ4'ύ3
4θ4'ώ
4κ4'ά
4κ4'έ
4κ4'ή3
4κ4'ί3
4κ4'ό
4κ4'ύ3
4κ4'ώ
4λ4'ά
4λ4'έ
4λ4'ή3
4λ4'ί3
4λ4'ό
4λ4'ύ3
4λ4'ώ
4μ4'ά
4μ4'έ
4μ4'ή3
4μ4'ί3
4μ4'ό
4μ4'ύ3
4μ4'ώ
4μ4π4'ά
4μ4π4'έ
4μ4π4'ή3
4μ4π4'ί3
4μ4π4'ό
4μ4π4'ύ3
4μ4π4'ώ
4ν4'ά
4ν4'έ
4ν4'ή3
4ν4'ί3
4ν4'ό
4ν4'ύ3
4ν4'ώ
4ν4τ4'ά
4ν4τ4'έ
4ν4τ4'ή3
4ν4τ4'ί3
4ν4τ4'ό
4ν4τ4'ύ3
4ν4τ4'ώ
4ξ4'ά
4ξ4'έ
4ξ4'ή3
4ξ4'ί3
4ξ4'ό
4ξ4'ύ3
4ξ4'ώ
4π4'ά
4π4'έ
4π4'ή3
4π4'ί3
4π4'ό
4π4'ύ3
4π4'ώ
4ρ4'ά
4ρ4'έ
4ρ4'ή3
4ρ4'ί3
4ρ4'ό
4ρ4'ύ3
4ρ4'ώ
4σ4'ά
4σ4'έ
4σ4'ή3
4σ4'ί3
4σ4'ό
4σ4'ύ3
4σ4'ώ
4τ4'ά
4τ4'έ
4τ4'ή3
4τ4'ί3
4τ4'ό
4τ4'ύ3
4τ4'ώ
4τ4ζ4'ά
4τ4ζ4'έ
4τ4ζ4'ή3
4τ4ζ4'ί3
4τ4ζ4'ό
4τ4ζ4'ύ3
4τ4ζ4'ώ
4τ4σ4'ά
4τ4σ4'έ
4τ4σ4'ή3
4τ4σ4'ί3
4τ4σ4'ό
4τ4σ4'ύ3
4τ4σ4'ώ
4φ4'ά
4φ4'έ
4φ4'ή3
4φ4'ί3
4φ4'ό
4φ4'ύ3
4φ4'ώ
4χ4'ά
4χ4'έ
4χ4'ή3
4χ4'ί3
4χ4'ό
4χ4'ύ3
4χ4'ώ
4ψ4'ά
4ψ4'έ
4ψ4'ή3
4ψ4'ί3
4ψ4'ό
4ψ4'ύ3
4ψ4'ώ
.β4
.γ4
.δ4
.ζ4
.θ4
.κ4
.λ4
.μ4
.ν4
.ξ4
.π4
.ρ4
.σ4
.τ4
.φ4
.χ4
.ψ4
4β1β
4γ1γ
4δ1δ
4ζ1ζ
4θ1θ
4κ1κ
4λ1λ
4μ1μ
4ν1ν
4π1π
4ρ1ρ
4σ1σ
4τ1τ
4φ1φ
4χ1χ
4ψ1ψ
4β1ζ
4β1θ
4β1κ
4β1μ
4β1ν
4β1ξ
4β1π
4β1σ
4β1τ
4β1φ
4β1χ
4β1ψ
4γ1β
4γ1ζ
4γ1θ
4γ1μ
4ρ1γ
4ρ5γ2μ
4γ1ξ
4γ1π
4γ1σ
4γ1τ
4γ1φ
4γ1χ
4γ1ψ
4δ1β
4δ1γ
4δ1ζ
4δ1θ
4δ1κ
4δ1λ 
4δ1ξ
4δ1π
4δ1σ
4δ1τ
4δ1φ
4δ1χ
4δ1ψ
4ζ1β
4ζ1γ
4ζ1δ
4ζ1θ
4ζ1κ
4ζ1λ
4ζ1μ
τ4ζ2μ
4ζ1ν
4ζ1ξ
4ζ1π
4ζ1ρ
4ζ1σ
4ζ1τ
4ζ1φ
4ζ1χ
4ζ1ψ
4θ1β
4θ1γ
4θ1δ
4θ1ζ
4θ1κ
4θ1μ
4ρ1θ
4ρ5θ2μ
σ4θ2μ
4θ1ξ
4θ1π
4θ1σ
4θ1τ
4θ1φ
4θ1χ
4θ1ψ
4κ1β
4κ1γ
4κ1δ
4κ1ζ
4κ1θ
4κ1μ
4λ1κ
4λ5κ2μ
4ρ1κ
4ρ5κ2μ
4κ1ξ
4κ1π
4κ1σ
4κ1φ
4ν1κ
4ν5κ2φ
4κ1χ
4κ1ψ
4λ1β
4λ1γ
4λ1δ
4λ1ζ
4λ1θ
4λ1μ
4λ1ν
4λ1ξ
4λ1π
4λ1ρ
4λ1σ
4λ1τ
4λ1φ
4λ1χ
4λ1ψ
4μ1β
4μ1γ
4μ1δ
4μ1ζ
4μ1θ
4μ1κ
4μ1λ
4μ1ξ
4μ1ρ
4μ1σ
4μ1τ
4μ1φ
4μ1χ
4μ1ψ
4ν1β
4ν1γ
4ν1δ
4ν1ζ
4ν1θ
4ν1λ
4ν1μ
4ν1ξ
4ν1π
4ν1ρ
4ν1σ
4ν1φ
4ν1χ
4ν1ψ
4ξ1β
4ξ1γ
4ξ1δ
4ξ1ζ
4ξ1θ
4ξ1κ
4ξ1λ
4ξ1μ
4ξ1ν
4ξ1π
4ξ1ρ
4ξ1σ
4ξ1τ
4γ5ξ2τ
4ρ1ξ
4ρ5ξ2τ
4ξ1φ
4ξ1χ
4ξ1ψ
4π1β
4π1γ
4π1δ
4π1ζ
4π1θ
4π1κ
4π1μ
4π1ξ
4π1σ
4π1φ
4π1χ
4π1ψ
4ρ1β
4ρ1δ
4ρ1ζ
4ρ1λ
4ρ1μ
4ρ1ν
4ρ1π
4ρ1σ
4ρ1τ
4ρ1φ
4ρ1χ
4ρ1ψ
4σ1δ
4σ1ζ 
4σ1ν
4σ1ξ
4σ1ρ
4σ1ψ
4τ1β
4τ1γ
4τ1δ
4τ1θ
4τ1κ 
4τ1ν
4τ1ξ
4τ1π
4τ1φ
σ4τ2φ
4τ1χ
4τ1ψ
4φ1β
4φ1γ
4φ1δ
4φ1ζ 
4φ1κ
4φ1μ 
4φ1ν
4φ1ξ
4φ1π
4φ1σ
4φ1χ
4φ1ψ
4χ1β
4χ1γ
4χ1δ
4χ1ζ
4χ1κ
4χ1μ
4ρ5χ2μ
4χ1ξ
4χ1π
4χ1σ
4χ1φ
4χ1ψ
4ψ1β
4ψ1γ
4ψ1δ
4ψ1ζ
4ψ1θ
4ψ1κ
4ψ1λ
4ψ1μ
4ψ1ν
4ψ1ξ
4ψ1π
4ψ1ρ
4ψ1σ
4ψ1τ
4μ5ψ2τ
4ψ1φ
4ψ1χ
4γ5κ2φ
4γ1κτ
4μ1πτ
4ν1τζ
4ν1τσ
4β4ρ.
4γ4λ.
4κ4λ.
4κ4τ.
4γ4κ4ς.
4γ4κ4σ.
γ4κ1σ
4κ4ς.
4κ4σ.
4λ4ς.
4λ4σ.
4μπ4λ.
4μπ4ν.
4μπ4ρ.
4μ4ς.
4μ4σ.
4ν4ς.
4ν4σ.
4ρ4ς.
4ρ4σ.
4σ4κ.
4σ4τ.
4τ4λ.
4τ4ρ.
4ν4τ4ς.
4ν4τ4σ.
4φ4τ.
5χ4τ.
4γκ1μπ
γ4κ1μ
4γκ1ντ
4γκ1τζ
4γκ1τσ
4μπ1ντ
4μπ1τζ
4μπ1τσ
4ντ1μπ
4τσ1γκ
4τσ1μπ
4τσ1ντ
τ4σ1ν
